Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE F. OTHER COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES

CHAPTER 107. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 107.01. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. The Texas Woman's University System is a woman-focused system composed of:

(1) Texas Woman's University; and

(2) any other institution assigned by law to the governance, control, jurisdiction, and management of the board of regents of the system.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 107.21. BOARD OF REGENTS. (a) The board of regents of the system is composed of nine persons, four of whom must be women, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.

(b) Each member of the board must be a qualified voter, and the members must be selected from different portions of the state.

(c) The members hold office for staggered terms of six years, with the terms of three expiring February 1 of odd-numbered years.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 2838, ch. 484, art. III, Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 1983.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 3, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.211. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL OF BOARD MEMBER. (a) It is a ground for removal from the board that a member:

(1) commits malfeasance of office;

(2) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(3) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled board meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year, unless the absence is excused by majority vote of the board.

(b) The validity of an action of the board is not affected by the fact that it was taken when a ground for removal of a board member existed.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 225, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2001.

Sec. 107.22. OFFICERS. The board shall biennially elect a presiding officer, an assistant presiding officer, and other officers it deems necessary from among its members.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 158, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 2001.

Sec. 107.23. BOARD MEETINGS; MINUTES. The presiding officer shall convene the board to consider any business connected with the system whenever the presiding officer deems it expedient. A full record shall be kept of all the board's proceedings.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 158, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 4, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.24. COMPENSATION OF BOARD. Members of the board shall receive the same compensation conferred by law on the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 107.41. EXTENT OF POWERS. The board has the power incident to its position and to the same extent, as far as applicable, as is conferred on the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 107.42. STAFF. (a) The board shall appoint a chief executive officer of the system and other officers and employees it deems proper and shall fix their salaries.

(b) The chief executive officer of the system shall also serve as the president of Texas Woman's University.

(c) The board shall make rules and regulations for the government of the system's staff as it deems advisable.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3253, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 5, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.43. DEPARTMENTS. The board shall divide the course of instruction into departments and shall select careful and efficient professors in each department, in order to secure the best possible instruction in all areas of study.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 107.44. RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board shall adopt rules and regulations it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the system and to enforce the faithful discharge of the duties of all officers, professors, and students.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 6, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.45. EMINENT DOMAIN; RESTRICTION. (a) The board of regents has the power of eminent domain to acquire for the use of the system in the manner prescribed by Chapter 21, Property Code, any real property that may be necessary and proper for carrying out its purposes.

(b) The taking of real property by the board under this section is declared to be for the use of this state. The board is not required to deposit a bond or the amount equal to the award of damages by the commissioners as provided by Section 21.021, Property Code.

(c) The board may not use the power of eminent domain to acquire real property that is dedicated to a public use by another governmental entity.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 42, ch. 26, Sec. 2, eff. March 24, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 276 (H.B. 389), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 7, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.46. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. The board is specifically authorized, upon terms and conditions acceptable to it, to accept, retain, and administer gifts, grants, or donations of any kind, including real estate or money, from any source, for use by the system, and to carry out the directions, limitations, and provisions declared in writing in the gifts, grants, or donations.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1251, ch. 271, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1983.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 8, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. DORMITORIES AND IMPROVEMENTS

Sec. 107.61. CONSTRUCTION OF DORMITORIES AND IMPROVEMENTS. The board may erect and equip, or may contract with any person, firm, or corporation for the erecting and equipping of dormitories and other improvements, which shall be located either on the campus or on land purchased or leased for the purpose by the board. The board may purchase or lease additional real estate for the purpose, or exchange or sell real estate for the purpose.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 107.62. OBLIGATIONS; PLEDGE OF REVENUE. In payment for the erecting and equipping of dormitories and improvements, the board may issue its obligations in the amount and on the terms deemed advisable by the board. As security the board may pledge the income from the dormitories and improvements erected or from other dormitories owned by the system, as well as all other revenue derived by the system from other sources, except revenue derived by means of appropriations made for a specific purpose by the legislature.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 10, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.63. SALE OF REAL ESTATE. The board may sell or encumber any part of real property owned by the system for the purpose of obtaining funds with which to erect and equip these improvements or for the purpose of securing the payment of its obligations issued to any person, firm, or corporation for the erecting or equipping of these improvements.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 11, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.64. REQUIRED DORMITORY RESIDENCE. The board may adopt regulations it deems reasonable requiring any class or classes of students to reside in system dormitories or other buildings.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 12, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.65. MANAGEMENT OF DORMITORIES. The board has absolute and sole management and control of system dormitories and other improvements.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3254, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 13, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.66. REQUISITION OF FURNISHINGS, EQUIPMENT, ETC. The board may make requisition to the comptroller for furniture, furnishings, equipment, and appointments required for the proper use and enjoyment of improvements erected by the board, and the comptroller may purchase and pay for the furnishings, equipment, and appointments.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3255, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.013, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.86, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 107.67. LIMITATION ON OBLIGATIONS. In the erecting, or in contracts for the erecting, of dormitories and other improvements, the board may not in any manner incur any indebtedness against the system except as provided in Sections 107.62 and 107.63. The obligations incurred in the erecting of dormitories and other improvements may never be personal obligations of the system but shall be discharged solely from the revenue or property authorized to be pledged for that purpose.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3255, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 14, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.68. GENERAL POWERS. The board may do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out the purpose and intent of this subchapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3255, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 107.69. STATE HISTORICAL COLLECTION. (a) The board may establish an historical collection of items illustrating the history of women in Texas. The historical collection is to be housed in a building belonging to the system and is to be known as "The History of Texas Women." When established, the historical collection may be designated a state historical collection and shall be for the use and enjoyment of all citizens of Texas.

(b) The board may accept donations, gifts, and collections of historical value for the use of the historical collection and shall adopt rules for the receipt, care, custody, and control of items in the collection.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1145, ch. 551, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 15, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. CAMPUS SECURITY PERSONNEL

Sec. 107.81. CONCURRENT JURISDICTION WITH CITY POLICE. (a) Campus security personnel commissioned under Section 51.203 have concurrent jurisdiction with police officers of a municipality in which a component institution of the system is located to enforce all criminal laws, including traffic laws, of the state and all ordinances of the municipality regulating traffic on any public street running through the property of the system and on any public street immediately adjacent to property owned or occupied and controlled by the system.

(b) The form and content of traffic citations issued for violations of law shall be similar to the type used by the State Highway Patrol and shall be filed in the municipal court or any justice of the peace court with jurisdiction of the offense.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 892, ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 16, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.82. ASSISTANCE TO CITY POLICE. (a) The board of regents and the governing body of a municipality in which a component institution of the system is located may enter into written agreements, authorized by resolution of each governing body, to authorize the regular employed peace officers of the system to assist the peace officers of the municipality in enforcing the laws of the state and the ordinances of the municipality at any location in the municipality.

(b) To be valid, an agreement under Subsection (a) of this section must be approved by the attorney general.

(c) While acting pursuant to the agreement in Subsection (a) and when such act is outside the property of the system or outside any public street running through, adjacent to, or within property owned or occupied and controlled by the system, the peace officers of the system are under the jurisdiction and command of the chief of police of the municipality.

(d) Neither the state nor the system is liable for actions of a campus police officer acting under the jurisdiction and command of the chief of police of the municipality.

(e) The system has jurisdiction over its personnel and students upon property owned by the system to the extent that it may:

(1) assign and regulate parking spaces for its use and charge and collect appropriate fees for parking and improper parking;

(2) prohibit parking where it deems necessary; and

(3) set and collect fees for and remove vehicles parked in violation of its rules and regulations or the laws of the State of Texas.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 892, ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 17, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.83. CITY DELEGATION OF PARKING REGULATION AUTHORITY. (a) By contract between the municipality and the system, the governing body of the municipality in which a component institution of the system is located may delegate to the system the authority to regulate the parking of vehicles on any public street running through or immediately adjacent to property owned or occupied and controlled by the system.

(b) The contract may authorize the system to assign and regulate parking spaces for its use, to charge and collect a fee from its personnel and students for parking, to prohibit parking, and to charge and collect a fee for removing vehicles parked in violation of law or ordinance or in violation of a rule governing the parking of vehicles adopted by the board. All parking violations shall be filed in the municipal court or the justice of the peace court having jurisdiction over the offense.

(c) Before the contract is considered by the governing body of the municipality or the board, the attorney general and the applicable city attorney shall review and either approve the contract or file written legal objections to the contract with the chief executive officer of both the board and the governing body of the municipality. The contract must be approved by resolution of the board and the governing body of the municipality.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 892, ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 18, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 107.84. CONSTRUCTION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter does not:

(1) limit the police powers of a municipality or its law enforcement jurisdiction;

(2) render a campus peace officer an employee of a municipality or entitle a campus peace officer to compensation from a municipality; or

(3) restrict the power of the system under other law to enforce laws, ordinances, or rules regulating traffic or parking.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 892, ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 19, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER F. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY

Sec. 107.101. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY. (a) Texas Woman's University is a woman-focused general academic teaching institution located in the city of Denton.

(b) The university is under the management and control of the board of regents.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 20, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER G. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY AT DALLAS

Sec. 107.151. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY AT DALLAS. (a) Texas Woman's University at Dallas is a woman-focused general academic teaching institution located in the city of Dallas.

(b) The university is under the management and control of the board of regents.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the university may operate as a general academic teaching institution only after the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that the university is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges and has been approved by the coordinating board to offer one or more degree programs. Until the coordinating board certifies that the conditions of this subsection have been met, the board of regents may operate a branch campus of Texas Woman's University in the city of Dallas.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 20, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER H. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY AT HOUSTON

Sec. 107.201. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY AT HOUSTON. (a) Texas Woman's University at Houston is a woman-focused general academic teaching institution located in the city of Houston.

(b) The university is under the management and control of the board of regents.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the university may operate as a general academic teaching institution only after the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that the university is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges and has been approved by the coordinating board to offer one or more degree programs. Until the coordinating board certifies that the conditions of this subsection have been met, the board of regents may operate a branch campus of Texas Woman's University in the city of Houston.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 20, eff. May 26, 2021.